Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6042.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-47-9.1 and 11-47-35.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47
entitled "Weapons" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-9.1. Additional exemptions.
The provisions of §§ 11-47-8 and 11-47-11 shall not apply to members of the state police,
members of city or town police forces, officers or employees of the United States authorized by
law to carry a concealed firearm, and members of the Rhode Island airport police department.
Persons exempted by the provisions of this section from the provisions of § 11-47-8 shall have the
right to carry concealed firearms everywhere within this state; provided, that this shall not be
construed as giving the right to carry concealed firearms to a person transporting firearms as
merchandise or as household or business goods.
11-47-35.1. Persons exempt from § 11-47-35.
The provisions of § 11-47-35 shall not apply to full-time members of the state police, full-
time members of the state marshal’s office, full-time members of city or town police departments,
officers or employees of the United States authorized by law to carry a concealed firearm, or state
marshals or correctional officers or persons licensed under § 11-47-11.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002305
========